Hawaii, session 2025, HB746.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Red Raider Productions is a student organization committed to enhancing the student experience at Kauai high school.  The legislature further finds that Red Raider Productions lacks the funding and personnel to fulfill its vision, which includes providing students the opportunity to build occupational skills, such as video production, hospitality, and culinary arts. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the department of education to transition the Red Raider Productions student organization at Kauai high school into a learning center through the department of education's learning centers program. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of education to transition the Red Raider Productions student organization at Kauai high school into a learning center through the department of education's learning centers program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________